Utah statutes.
53C-5-102.   Grazing permits -- Treatment of permits on federal lands required by the state.

(1) (a)  The director may issue grazing permits on trust lands under terms and conditions established by rules of the director.

(b)  Those terms shall be based on the fair market value of the permit.

(2) (a)  Upon selecting, exchanging, or otherwise acquiring lands of the United States, the director shall honor, for the remainder of the applicable term, all leases, permits, and contracts, and the related terms and conditions of user agreements on United States lands, including permitted stocking rates, grazing fee levels, access rights, and all existing activities that currently or historically have dictated an understanding of usage between the land user and the federal government.

(b)  Improvements of the permittee or lessee to the land shall be honored by the state in the acquisition of federal lands.



Enacted by Chapter 294, 1994 General Session

